Hawaii statutes.
§141-5 Charges for inspection, etc.
The department of agriculture, with the approval of the governor, shall adopt a
reasonable scale of charges, which may be changed from time to time, for the
inspection, disinfection, fumigation, and quarantine that is authorized,
required, or permitted by this chapter or chapter 142, 150, or 150A.
Certificates and permits in these chapters concerning articles or animals
imported, or proposed to be imported, into the State, and the charges provided
for, shall be paid for in advance before any certificate or permit is
delivered, or any of the articles or animals are permitted to be landed. If
thereafter further expense is incurred in the inspection, treatment, or
quarantine of any of the articles or animals, the charges shall be paid before
any of the articles or animals shall be delivered. [L 1903, c 44, §15; am L
1905, c 82, §2; RL 1925, §642; RL 1935, §238; RL 1945, §1364; RL 1955, §18-16;
am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §141-5; am L 2008, c 236, §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next